en: 3D printer cleaning kit components included: Brush; Cleaning solution; Cleaning wipes; Dust blower; Glue remover; Lint-free cloth; Microfiber cloth; Nozzle cleaning needle; Nozzle drill bit; Resin filter; Resin tank cleaner; Scraper; Vacuum tool; Other
it: Componenti del kit di pulizia per stampante 3D inclusi: Pennello; Soluzione detergente; Salviette detergenti; Soffiatore antipolvere; Rimuovi colla; Panno senza pelucchi; Panno in microfibra; Ago per pulizia ugello; Punta per ugello; Filtro resina; Detergente per serbatoio resina; Raschietto; Strumento aspirapolvere; Altro
cs: Obsažené součásti čisticí sady pro 3D tiskárnu: Štětec; Čisticí roztok; Čisticí ubrousky; Ofukovač prachu; Odstraňovač lepidla; Hadřík bez žmolků; Mikrovláknová utěrka; Jehla na čištění trysky; Vrták na trysku; Filtr na pryskyřici; Čistič nádrže na pryskyřici; Škrabka; Vysavačový nástroj; Jiné
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплекта за почистване на 3D принтер: Четка; Почистващ разтвор; Почистващи кърпички; Духалка за прах; Премахвач на лепило; Кърпа без власинки; Микрофибърна кърпа; Игла за почистване на дюзата; Свредло за дюзата; Филтър за смола; Почистващ препарат за резервоара за смола; Стъргалка; Инструмент за прахосмукане; Други
th: ส่วนประกอบชุดทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D ที่รวมอยู่: แปรง; น้ำยาทำความสะอาด; ผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาด; ที่เป่าฝุ่น; น้ำยาลอกกาว; ผ้าไม่มีขุย; ผ้าไมโครไฟเบอร์; เข็มทำความสะอาดหัวฉีด; ดอกสว่านสำหรับหัวฉีด; ตัวกรองเรซิน; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดถังเรซิน; ที่ขูด; เครื่องดูดฝุ่น; อื่นๆ
tr: 3D yazıcı temizlik kiti dahil bileşenler: Fırça; Temizlik solüsyonu; Temizlik mendilleri; Toz üfleyici; Yapıştırıcı sökücü; Tüy bırakmayan bez; Mikrofiber bez; Nozul temizleme iğnesi; Nozul matkap ucu; Reçine filtresi; Reçine tankı temizleyici; Kazıyıcı; Vakum aleti; Diğer
sv: Komponenter i rengöringskit för 3D-skrivare: Borste; Rengöringslösning; Rengöringsdukar; Dammblås; Limborttagare; Luddfri duk; Mikrofiberduk; Munstyckesrengöringsnål; Munstyckesborr; Hartsfilter; Hartstankrengöring; Skrapa; Vakuumverktyg; Övrigt
vi: Linh kiện trong bộ vệ sinh máy in 3D được bao gồm: Cọ; Dung dịch vệ sinh; Khăn lau vệ sinh; Bình thổi bụi; Chất tẩy keo; Vải không xơ; Khăn sợi siêu mịn; Kim vệ sinh vòi phun; Mũi khoan vòi phun; Bộ lọc nhựa; Chất vệ sinh bể nhựa; Dụng cụ cạo; Dụng cụ hút bụi; Khác
da: Rengøringssæt til 3D-printer inkluderet: Børste; Rengøringsopløsning; Rengøringsservietter; Støvblæser; Limfjerner; Fnugfri klud; Mikrofiberklud; Dyserensningsnål; Dysebor; Harpiksfilter; Harpikstankrenser; Skraber; Støvsugerværktøj; Andet
zh-CN: 3D 打印机清洁套件包含的组件: 刷子; 清洁液; 清洁湿巾; 吹尘器; 胶水去除剂; 无绒布; 超细纤维布; 喷嘴清洁针; 喷嘴钻头; 树脂过滤器; 树脂槽清洁剂; 刮刀; 真空工具; 其他
sl-SI: Vključene komponente kompleta za čiščenje 3D tiskalnika: Krtačna; Čistilna raztopina; Čistilni robčki; Pihalnik prahu; Odstranjevalec lepila; Krpa brez vlaken; Krpa iz mikrovlaken; Igla za čiščenje šobe; Sveder za šobo; Filter za smolo; Čistilo za posodo s smolo; Strgalo; Sesalno orodje; Drugo
ja: 3Dプリンタークリーニングキット付属コンポーネント: ブラシ; クリーニング液; クリーニングワイプ; ダストブロワー; 接着剤除去剤; 不織布クロス; マイクロファイバークロス; ノズルクリーニング針; ノズルドリルビット; レジンフィルター; レジンタンククリーナー; スクレーパー; 真空ツール; その他
es: Componentes incluidos en el kit de limpieza para impresora 3D: Pincel; Solución de limpieza; Toallitas de limpieza; Soplador de polvo; Removedor de pegamento; Paño sin pelusa; Paño de microfibra; Aguja de limpieza de boquilla; Broca para boquilla; Filtro de resina; Limpiador de tanque de resina; Raspador; Herramienta de vacío; Otros
ko: 3D 프린터 청소 키트 포함 구성품: 브러시; 클리닝 용액; 클리닝 와이프; 먼지 제거기; 접착제 제거제; 보푸라기 없는 천; 극세사 천; 노즐 클리닝 니들; 노즐 드릴 비트; 레진 필터; 레진 탱크 클리너; 스크레이퍼; 진공 도구; 기타
hu: 3D nyomtató tisztítókészlet tartalmazott komponensei: Ecset; Tisztítófolyadék; Tisztítókendő; Porfúvó; Ragasztó-eltávolító; Szöszmentes kendő; Mikroszálas kendő; Fúvókatisztító tű; Fúvóka fúrófej; Gyantaszűrő; Gyanta tartály tisztító; Kaparó; Porszívó eszköz; Egyéb
ru: Компоненты набора для чистки 3D-принтера в комплекте: Кисть; Чистящий раствор; Чистящие салфетки; Пылесос; Средство для удаления клея; Безворсовая ткань; Салфетка из микрофибры; Игла для чистки сопла; Сверло для сопла; Фильтр для смолы; Очиститель резервуара для смолы; Скребок; Вакуумный инструмент; Другой
nb: 3D-skriver rengjøringssett komponenter inkludert: Børste; Rengjøringsløsning; Rengjøringsservietter; Støvblåser; Limfjerner; Lofri klut; Mikrofiberklut; Dyserengjøringsnål; Dyseborbits; Harpiksefilter; Harpikstankrens; Skrape; Støvsugerverktøy; Annet
sk-SK: Súčasti čistiacej sady 3D tlačiarne: Štetec; Čistiaci roztok; Čistiace utierky; Ofukovač prachu; Odstraňovač lepidla; Handričky bez vlákien; Mikrovláknová utierka; Ihla na čistenie trysky; Vrtáčik na trysku; Filter na živicu; Čistič nádrže na živicu; Škrabka; Vysávací nástroj; Iné
fr: Composants du kit de nettoyage inclus pour imprimante 3D: Brosse; Solution de nettoyage; Lingettes de nettoyage; Souffleur de poussière; Dissolvant de colle; Chiffon non pelucheux; Chiffon en microfibre; Aiguille de nettoyage de buse; Foret de buse; Filtre à résine; Nettoyant pour bac à résine; Grattoir; Outil d'aspiration; Autre
hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta za čišćenje 3D pisača: Četkica; Otopina za čišćenje; Maramice za čišćenje; Puhač prašine; Sredstvo za uklanjanje ljepila; Krpa bez dlačica; Krpa od mikrovlakana; Igla za čišćenje mlaznice; Svrdlo za mlaznicu; Filter za smolu; Sredstvo za čišćenje spremnika smole; Strugač; Usisni alat; Ostalo
fi: 3D-tulostimen puhdistussarja komponentit mukaan lukien: Sivellin; Puhdistusliuos; Puhdistusliinat; Pölyäpuhallin; Liiman poistoaine; Nukkaamaton kangas; Mikrokuituliina; Suuttimen puhdistusneula; Suuttimen poranterä; Hartsisiivilä; Hartsisäiliön puhdistusaine; Kaavin; Imutyökalu; Muu
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des 3D-Drucker-Reinigungssets: Bürste; Reinigungslösung; Reinigungstücher; Staubgebläse; Klebstoffentferner; Fusselfreies Tuch; Mikrofasertuch; Düsenreinigungsnadel; Düsenbohrer; Harzfilter; Harztankreiniger; Schaber; Saugwerkzeug; Sonstiges
lt-LT: 3D spausdintuvo valymo rinkinio įtraukti komponentai: Šepetėlis; Valymo tirpalas; Valymo servetėlės; Dulkių pūstuvas; Klijų valiklis; Nepūkuojanti šluostė; Mikropluošto šluostė; Purkštuko valymo adata; Purkštuko gręžtas; Dervos filtras; Dervos bako valiklis; Grandiklis; Vakuuminis įrankis; Kita
el: Εξαρτήματα κιτ καθαρισμού 3D εκτυπωτή που περιλαμβάνονται: Βούρτσα; Διάλυμα καθαρισμού; Μαντηλάκια καθαρισμού; Φυσητήρας σκόνης; Αφαιρετικό κόλλας; Πανί χωρίς χνούδι; Πανί μικροϊνών; Βελόνα καθαρισμού ακροφυσίου; Τρυπάνι ακροφυσίου; Φίλτρο ρητίνης; Καθαριστικό δεξαμενής ρητίνης; Ξύστρα; Εργαλείο αναρρόφησης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos no kit de limpeza para impressora 3D: Pincel; Solução de limpeza; Lenços de limpeza; Soprador de poeira; Removedor de cola; Pano sem fiapos; Pano de microfibra; Agulha de limpeza de bico; Broca para bico; Filtro de resina; Limpador de tanque de resina; Raspador; Ferramenta de vácuo; Outro
nl: 3D-printer reinigingskit inbegrepen componenten: Borstel; Reinigingsoplossing; Reinigingsdoekjes; Stofblazer; Lijmverwijderaar; Pluisvrije doek; Microvezeldoek; Spuitmond reinigingsnaald; Spuitmond boortje; Harsfilter; Harstank reiniger; Schraper; Stofzuigerhulpstuk; Andere
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no kit de limpeza para impressora 3D: Pincel; Solução de limpeza; Toalhetes de limpeza; Soprador de pó; Removedor de cola; Pano sem fiapos; Pano de microfibra; Agulha de limpeza de bico; Broca para bico; Filtro de resina; Limpador de tanque de resina; Raspador; Ferramenta de vácuo; Outro
ro-RO: Componente incluse în kitul de curățare pentru imprimantă 3D: Perie; Soluție de curățare; Șervețele de curățare; Suflantă de praf; Dizolvant pentru lipici; Lavetă fără scame; Lavetă din microfibră; Ac de curățare duză; Burghiu pentru duză; Filtru pentru rășină; Soluție de curățare rezervor rășină; Răzuitoare; Instrument de aspirare; Altele
zh-TW: 包含的 3D 印表機清潔套件組件: 畫筆; 清潔液; 清潔濕巾; 吹塵器; 除膠劑; 無塵布; 超細纖維布; 噴嘴清潔針; 噴嘴鑽頭; 樹脂過濾器; 樹脂槽清潔器; 刮刀; 吸塵工具; 其他
pl: Elementy zestawu do czyszczenia drukarki 3D w zestawie: Pędzel; Roztwór czyszczący; Chusteczki czyszczące; Dmuchawa do kurzu; Środek do usuwania kleju; Ściereczka niepozostawiająca włókien; Ściereczka z mikrofibry; Igła do czyszczenia dyszy; Wiertło do dyszy; Filtr żywicy; Środek do czyszczenia zbiornika żywicy; Skrobak; Narzędzie próżniowe; Inne